incubator/apertium-sw-rn/apertium-sw-rn.rn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<v%>
%<sg1%>
%<pres%>
%<inf%>

%<III%>
%<V%>

@P.PREFIX.ku@
@R.PREFIX.ku@
@D.PREFIX.ku@
@P.PREFIX.nda@
@R.PREFIX.nda@
@D.PREFIX.nda@

LEXICON Root

NounStems ; 
V-Prefixes ; 
VerbStems ; 

LEXICON Nreg-III

%<n%>%<III%>: # ;

LEXICON Nreg-V

%<n%>%<V%>: # ;


LEXICON V-Prefixes

@P.PREFIX.ku@:@P.PREFIX.ku@ku%> VerbStems ; 
@P.PREFIX.nda@:@P.PREFIX.nda@nda%> VerbStems ; 

LEXICON Vreg 

@D.PREFIX.nda@@D.PREFIX.ku@%<v%>:@D.PREFIX.nda@@D.PREFIX.ku@ # ;
@R.PREFIX.ku@%<v%>%<inf%>:@R.PREFIX.ku@ # ;

@R.PREFIX.nda@%<v%>%<pres%>%<sg1%>:@R.PREFIX.nda@ # ;

LEXICON NounStems 

amazi Nreg-III ; ! "water"
inzoga Nreg-V ; ! "beer"

LEXICON VerbStems 

nywa Vreg ; ! "drink"
shaka Vreg ; ! "want"
